Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.685

Child care—Toll-free information number.

(1) The department shall establish and maintain a toll-free telephone number, and an interactive web-based system through which persons may obtain information regarding child day care centers, outdoor nature-based child care providers, and family day care providers. This number shall be available twenty-four hours a day for persons to request information. The department shall respond to recorded messages left at the number within two business days. The number shall be published in reasonably available printed and electronic media. The number shall be easily identifiable as a number through which persons may obtain information regarding child day care centers and family day care providers as set forth in this section.

(2) Through the toll-free telephone line established by this section, the department shall provide information to callers about: (a) Whether a day care provider is licensed; (b) whether a day care provider's license is current; (c) the general nature of any enforcement against the providers; (d) how to report suspected or observed noncompliance with licensing requirements; (e) how to report alleged abuse or neglect in a day care; (f) how to report health, safety, and welfare concerns in a day care; (g) how to receive follow-up assistance, including information on the office of the family and children's ombuds; and (h) how to receive referral information on other agencies or entities that may be of further assistance to the caller.

(3) The department shall print the toll-free number established by this section on the face of new licenses issued to child day care centers, outdoor nature-based child care providers, and family day care providers.

(4) This section shall not be construed to require the disclosure of any information that is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2021 c 304 s 23; 2013 c 23 s 99; 2006 c 209 s 10; 2005 c 473 s 3. Formerly RCW 43.215.520, 74.15.310.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2005 c 473: See note following RCW 74.15.300.